Idaho, session 2025, H0378.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 7, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 7
TRANSPARENCY IN LEGISLATIVE TRAVEL
74-701. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to
promote public confidence in government and to promote transparency by
requiring legislators, legislators-elect, and candidates for legislative
office to report travel paid for by others.
74-702. REPORTING OF PAID TRAVEL -- PENALTY. (1) All legislative offi-
cials shall report to the secretary of state all travel outside of Idaho rea-
sonably related to a legislative or governmental purpose or to an issue of
state, national, or international public policy paid for by another individ-
ual or entity. Travel paid through campaign funds that are reported pursuant
to chapter 66, title 67, Idaho Code, or solely through personal funds of a
legislative official shall not be subject to the requirements of this sec-
tion. For the purposes of this section, "legislative official" means a leg-
islative candidate who will appear on a general election ballot, a member of
the Idaho legislature, and a member-elect of the Idaho legislature who has
prevailed in a general election but has not yet received the oath of office.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of the return date of any travel subject to
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a legislative official who
is subject to the reporting requirements provided for in subsection (1) of
this section shall file a report with the secretary of state that includes:
(a) The travel destination;
(b) The dates of travel;
(c) The purpose of the travel; and
(d) The name and address of the person or entity that paid for the
travel, including whether the travel was a campaign contribution and,
in the case of current members of the legislature, whether the travel
was made in such member's official capacity as a legislator.
(3) Any legislative official who fails to file the report required pur-
suant to subsection (2) of this section within thirty (30) days shall be sub-


ject to a late fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each day un-
til the report is filed, which fee shall be deposited in the public school in-
come fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.